Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-4618
340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act, how cited.

Sections 44-4618 to 44-4622 shall be known and may be cited as the 340B Contract Pharmacy Protection Act.

Laws 2025, LB168, § 1.